Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-131] Releasing prisoner without
proper authority. Any person subject to this chapter who, without proper
authority, releases any prisoner committed to the person's charge, or who
through neglect or design suffers any such prisoner to escape, shall be
punished as a court-martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was
committed in strict compliance with law. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next